Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
347

BLIND,
VISUALLY HANDICAPPED, AND OTHER DISABLED PERSONS

Section

347-1 Visually handicapped defined

347-2 Blind, defined

347-2.5 Service dog, defined

347-3 Department; general powers

347-4 Vocational rehabilitation of blind

347-5 Obtaining federal benefits

347-6 Registration of blind

347-7 Agencies for information and industrial
aid

347-8 Workshops

347-9 Visiting blind and visually handicapped
persons; home

teaching

347-10 Donations and examinations for sight
conservation

347-11 Protection of records; divulging
confidential

information prohibited; penalties;
payments to blind

inalienable

347-12 Blind shop and handicraft program

347-12.5 Randolph-Sheppard revolving account

347-13 Persons who are blind, visually
handicapped,

disabled; public places; public
conveyances

347-13.5 Suits by individuals; jurisdiction; venue

347-14 Penalty

347-15 Fares for blind person and guide

347-16 Canes, use in public places

347-17 Driver of vehicle, caution

347-18 Penalty

347-19 Rights of blind; partially blind

347-20 Legislative findings

Note

Chapter heading amended by L 2011, c 175, §5.

Law Journals and Reviews

Timesharing in the 1990s. I HBJ, no. 13, at 89 (1997).

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next